Hawaii statutes.
[§171-152] General powers. (a) In
carrying out its functions under this part, the board may do all things
necessary, useful, and convenient in connection with the restoration of beach
lands, subject to all applicable laws, and may provide any necessary assistance
to any county or nongovernmental organization in the restoration of beach lands
so long as the public interest is served; provided that for beach restoration
on privately-owned lands, the board shall be required to obtain authorization
from affected property owners.

(b) The board or the board's designee, subject
to this chapter and chapters 183C and 205A, shall maintain and manage beach
lands restored pursuant to this part as well as a beach restoration plan
described in section 171-153, subject to available funds. [L 1999, c 84, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next